Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 7
BONDS - REFUNDING BONDED DEBT

30-35-701. Refunding bonds - amount.

The governing body of a home rule county may issue negotiable coupon bonds, to be denominated refunding bonds, for the purpose of refunding any of the bonded indebtedness of the county whether due or not, or which has or may become payable at the option of the county or by consent of the bondholders, or by any lawful means, whether such bonded indebtedness is existing on or is created on or after June 8, 1981. The amount of such refunding bonds to be issued under the provisions of this part 7 shall first be determined by the governing body, and a certificate of such determination shall be made and entered in and upon the records of the county prior to the issuance of said refunding bonds.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1477, § 1, effective June 8.

30-35-702. Vote of electors - when not required.

Whenever such governing body deems it expedient to issue refunding bonds under the provisions of this part 7 and the net interest cost and the net effective interest rate of the proposed issue of refunding bonds does not exceed the net interest cost and net effective interest rate of the issue of bonds to be refunded, such refunding bonds may be issued without the submission of the question of issuing such refunding bonds to a vote of the qualified electors of the county. The issuance of bonds under this part 7 for the purpose of refunding bonds which were originally issued to supply water to the county shall not require approval of such electors.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1477, § 1, effective June 8.

30-35-703. Vote of electors - when required - procedures.

Whenever such governing body deems it expedient to issue refunding bonds under the provisions of this part 7 and either the net interest cost or the net effective interest rate of the proposed issue of refunding bonds exceeds the net interest cost or the net effective interest rate, respectively, of the issue of bonds to be refunded, the governing body, by ordinance or resolution, shall submit the question of issuing said refunding bonds at a special election called and held for that purpose or at a regular election of county officers; but bonds issued under this part 7 for the purpose of refunding bonds which were originally issued to supply water to the county shall not require such approval of the electors. An election held under this section shall be held in the manner provided for the authorization of an original bonded indebtedness in section 30-35-201 (6).

At any election held under the provisions of this part 7, the question of authorizing the refunding of all or any part of the then outstanding bonded indebtedness of the county may be submitted as one question for determination, whether such bonds are of the same or of different issues.

The election shall be conducted as nearly as may be in conformity with the provisions of the general election laws.

The election notice shall specify, in addition to the time and places for holding said election, the qualifications for persons to vote on such question, the amount and date of the bonds to be refunded, the amount of refunding bonds proposed to be issued, and the maximum net effective rate of interest at which they may be issued.

At such election the ballots or voting machine tabs shall contain the words "For the Refunding Bonds" and "Against the Refunding Bonds".

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1478, § 1, effective June 8.

30-35-704. Ordinance for bond issue - bonds.

If the governing body determines to issue refunding bonds without an election by meeting the requirements set forth in sections 30-35-701 to 30-35-703, or if, upon canvassing the vote cast at any election held under the provisions of this part 7, it is determined by the governing body that a majority of the legal votes cast upon the question submitted are in favor of refunding, the governing body shall make such determination a part of the official records of the county and shall immediately thereafter adopt an ordinance providing for the issuance of said refunding bonds in accordance with the provisions of this part 7.

Such ordinance shall fix the date of said refunding bonds, shall designate the denominations thereof, shall designate the maximum net effective interest rate, the rate or rates of interest of individual bonds, the maturity dates, and the place or alternate places of payment within or without the state of Colorado, of both principal and interest, and shall prescribe the form of said refunding bonds.

Such refunding bonds shall be negotiable in form, shall recite the title of the ordinance under which they are issued, and shall be executed in the name of the county and signed by the executive officer, countersigned by the treasurer, with the seal of the county affixed thereto, and attested by the county clerk and recorder. The interest accruing on such refunding bonds shall be evidenced by interest coupons thereto attached, bearing the engraved facsimile signature of the treasurer of the county. When so executed, such coupons shall be the binding obligations of the county, according to their import.

In the adoption of said ordinance providing for the issuance of said refunding bonds, the governing body shall make the principal of the debt payable in annual or semiannual installments commencing not later than five years after the date of such bonds and maturing during a period not exceeding thirty-five years from the date thereof. The amounts of such maturities shall be fixed by the governing body. The right to redeem all or any part of said issue of bonds prior to the respective maturities thereof and the order of any such redemption may be reserved in said ordinance, and, if so reserved, shall be set forth on the face of said bonds.

Outstanding bonds, which are secured by a pledge of specific special funds or revenues of the county in addition to the general ad valorem tax revenues of said county, may be refunded under the provisions of this part 7, and substantial compliance with the provisions of this article shall be deemed and taken to be sufficient to legally authorize such refunding and the issuance of refunding bonds for such purpose, without further actions being taken by the county. Such a pledge of specific special funds or revenues need not be made to additionally secure the refunding bonds so issued, but such funds or revenues may be so pledged if it is deemed advisable by the governing body of the county.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1478, § 1, effective June 8.

30-35-705. Exchange - sale - proceeds - amounts.

Such refunding bonds may be exchanged dollar for dollar for the bonds to be refunded, or they may be sold at, above, or below their par value at a price or prices such that the net effective interest rate of the issue of refunding bonds does not exceed the maximum net effective interest rate authorized. Such refunding bonds shall be in a principal amount not exceeding the principal amount of the bonds to be refunded, as directed by the governing body, and the proceeds thereof shall be applied only to the purpose for which such refunding bonds were issued. The principal amount of said refunding bonds may be the same as or less than the principal amount of the bonds to be refunded, if due, adequate, and sufficient provision has been made for the payment, or redemption, and retirement of said bonds to be refunded and the payment of the interest accruing and having accrued thereon in accordance with this article.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1479, § 1, effective June 8.

30-35-706. Tax for payment of refunding bonds.

The interest accruing on such refunding bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of this part 7 prior to the time when the proceeds of tax levies are available therefor shall be paid out of the general revenues or any other revenues of the county available therefor. For the purpose of reimbursing such general revenues or other revenues and for the payment of subsequently accruing interest, the governing body shall levy annually a sufficient tax upon all the taxable property in the county fully to discharge such interest. For the ultimate payment or redemption of such refunding bonds there shall be certified and levied annually such a tax upon all the taxable property in such county as will create a fund sufficient to pay or redeem and discharge such refunding bonds at or prior to their respective maturities; but in the event the bonds to be redeemed and the interest thereon accruing would have been paid from taxes levied upon only part of the taxable property in the county, the taxes levied for payment or redemption of the refunding bonds, and the interest accruing thereon, shall be levied in the same manner and upon only the same taxable property as would have been levied for payment of the bonds to be refunded if no refunding of said bonds had been made and accomplished. As collected, all taxes levied for payment of interest on and for the payment or redemption of the principal of such bonds shall be kept by the treasurer of the county in a special fund, to be used only in the payment of the interest upon and for the payment or redemption of the principal of such bonds. Such tax shall be levied and collected in the same manner as other county taxes are levied and collected. The ordinance authorizing the issuance of said bonds shall set forth the years in which such taxes shall be levied for the creation of said fund.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1479, § 1, effective June 8.

30-35-707. Ordinance not to be altered.

Any ordinance authorizing an issue of refunding bonds under the provisions of this part 7 and providing for the levy of taxes for the payment of the interest upon and the principal of such refunding bonds shall not be altered or repealed until the indebtedness thereby authorized shall have been fully paid.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1480, § 1, effective June 8.

30-35-708. Combined issues - procedures.

Any such refunding bonds may be issued to refund one or more issues of outstanding bonds of a county; but no two or more issues of outstanding bonds may be refunded by a single issue of refunding bonds unless the taxable property upon which tax levies are being made for payment of each such outstanding issue of bonds is identical to the taxable property on which such levies are being made for the payment of all other outstanding bonds proposed to be refunded by such single issue of refunding bonds. In the event that two or more issues of outstanding bonds of a county are to be refunded by the issuance of a single issue of refunding bonds, as provided in this section, the net interest cost and net effective interest rate on the bonds to be refunded shall be computed as if all of said bonds had originally been combined as a single issue aggregating the total of the smaller issues, and the results of this computation shall be compared with the net interest cost and net effective interest rate on the whole of the single refunding issue for purposes of determining the necessity of submitting the question of issuing such refunding bonds to a vote of the registered electors of the county.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1480, § 1, effective June 8.

30-35-709. Application of refunding bond proceeds - procedures - limitations.

The proceeds derived from the issuance of any refunding bonds under the provisions of this part 7 shall either be immediately applied to the payment, or redemption, and retirement of the bonds to be refunded and the cost and expense incident to such procedures, or shall immediately be placed in escrow to be applied to the payment of said bonds upon their presentation therefor and the costs and expenses incident to such proceedings and for no other purpose or purposes whatsoever until the bonds being refunded have been paid in full and discharged, and all accrued interest thereon has also been paid in full, upon which occurrences the escrow shall terminate, and any funds remaining therein shall be returned to the county and may be used to pay other bonds of the county.

The costs and expenses incident to the refunding of outstanding bonded indebtedness, the issuance of refunding bonds, and the establishment and maintenance of escrow accounts, pursuant to the provisions of this part 7, may be paid from any moneys or funds of the county which are legally available therefor. Any moneys or funds of the county legally available therefor may be placed in any escrow account established under the provisions of this article and may be used and expended for the purposes specified in the escrow agreement if such procedure is deemed by the governing body to be in the best interests of the county.

Any escrowed funds, pending such use, may be invested or, if necessary, reinvested only in securities meeting the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., maturing at such times as to insure the prompt payment of the bonds refunded under the provisions of this article and the interest accruing thereon.

Escrowed funds and investments, together with any interest to be derived from such investments, shall be in an amount which at all times shall be sufficient to pay the bonds refunded as they become due at their respective maturities or as they are called for redemption and payment on prior redemption dates, as to principal, interest, any prior redemption premium due, and any charges of the escrow agent payable therefrom. The computations made in determining such sufficiency shall be verified by a certified public accountant.

For the purpose of implementing the provisions of this part 7, the governing body of any county shall have the power to enter into escrow agreements and to establish escrow accounts with any commercial bank having full trust powers located within this state which is a member of the federal deposit insurance corporation under protective covenants and agreements whereby such accounts shall be fully secured by direct obligations of the United States, or shall be invested in such direct obligations only, in such amounts as will be sufficient and maturing at such times so as to insure the prompt payment of the bonds refunded, and the interest accruing thereon, under the provisions of this part 7.

In no event shall the aggregate amount of bonded indebtedness of any county exceed the maximum allowable amount as determined pursuant to the provisions of the state constitution, statutes, and charter applicable to such county. In determining and computing such aggregate amount of bonded indebtedness of any home rule county, bonds which have been refunded, as provided in this part 7, either by immediate payment, or redemption and retirement, or by the placement of the proceeds of refunding bonds in escrow shall not be deemed outstanding indebtedness from and after the date on which sufficient moneys are placed with the paying agent of such outstanding bonds for the purpose of immediately paying, or redeeming, and retiring such bonds, or from and after the date on which the proceeds of said refunding bonds are placed in such an escrow.

The issuance of refunding bonds by any home rule county for the purposes and in the manner authorized by this article, or under the provisions of any other enabling law, shall never be interpreted or taken to be the creation of an indebtedness which would require the approval of the qualified electors of the county, and no such approval shall be required for the issuance of such refunding bonds except as is specifically required by this part 7 or such other law under which said refunding bonds are sought to be issued or have been issued.

No bonds may be refunded under the provisions of this part 7 unless the holders thereof voluntarily surrender said bonds for immediate exchange or immediate payment or unless said bonds either mature or are callable for redemption prior to their maturity under their terms within ten years from the date of issuance of the refunding bonds, and provisions shall be made for paying, or redeeming, and discharging all of the bonds refunded within said period of time.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1480, § 1, effective June 8.

L. 89:

(3) amended, p. 1114, § 24, effective July 1.

30-35-710. Registration of refunding bonds.

Whenever any home rule county issues refunding bonds under the provisions of this part 7, the governing body shall direct that the county clerk and recorder, as a part of said county clerk and recorder's duties, register said bonds in a book to be kept by him for that purpose, and when so registered, the legality thereof shall not be open to contest by the county or by any other person or corporation in behalf of the county for any reason whatever. It is the duty of the county clerk and recorder to register said bonds, noting the principal amount, the date of issuance and maturity, and rate or rates of interest of said bonds.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1482, § 1, effective June 8.

30-35-711. Redemption of refunding bonds prior to maturity - procedures.

In the event that any bonds of a home rule county, either bonds issued for refunding purposes or bonds issued for other purposes as set forth in section 30-35-201 (6), have been or are made redeemable prior to their respective maturities and the governing body determines that all or any part of such bonds should be called for redemption, according to their terms, it is the duty of the county clerk and recorder, as soon as the governing body has authorized the redemption, to cause notice to be given of such action.

Such notice shall be given by publication at least one time in a newspaper customarily used by said county for legal notices at least thirty days prior to the date on which said bonds are to be redeemed and paid. Such notice shall contain the place or places and date on which said bonds shall be redeemed and paid, shall describe the bonds by their legal designation, date, number, and amount, and shall state that after the date so fixed for redemption and payment the interest on said bonds shall cease.

After the date so fixed for redemption and payment, the bonds so called for redemption and payment shall cease to draw interest.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1482, § 1, effective June 8.

30-35-712. "Net interest cost" - "net effective interest rate".

For the purposes of this part 7, the terms "net interest cost" and "net effective interest rate" have the meanings set forth in section 30-35-201 (6).

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1482, § 1, effective June 8.